California statutes. Probate Code
(a) The qualification examination for applicants for appointment to act as a probate referee shall be held at times and places within the state determined by the Controller.

(b) The Controller may contract with another agency to administer the qualification examination. Administration of the examination shall include:

(1) Development of standards for passage of the examination.

(2) Preparation of examination questions.

(3) Giving the examination.

(4) Scoring the examination.

(c) Each applicant shall pay a fee for taking the qualification examination. The agency administering the examination shall transmit to the Controller a list of candidates who have received a passing score in the examination. The list is a public record.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

403.

(a) The term of office of a probate referee is four years, expiring June 30. A person may be appointed to complete the unexpired term of office of a probate referee whose appointment is revoked or is otherwise terminated. For a period of five years from the date of expiration of the term of office, a person who had been appointed to act as a probate referee is eligible for reappointment. 

(b) If the Controller increases the number of probate referees in a county, the Controller shall stagger the terms of the new appointees so that one-quarter, or as close to one-quarter
 as possible, of the terms of the probate referees in that county expire on June 30 of each succeeding year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

404.

(a) The Controller shall establish and may amend standards of training, performance, and ethics of probate referees. The standards are a public record.

(b) The Controller may revoke the appointment of a person to act as a probate referee for noncompliance with any standard of training, performance, or ethics established under subdivision (a). The Controller may revoke an appointment under this subdivision without notice or a hearing, but the revocation is subject to review by writ of mandate in a court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

405.

Notwithstanding Section 404, the Controller may, at the Controller’s pleasure, revoke the appointment of a person to act as a probate referee. Under this section, the Controller may revoke the appointment of not more than 10 percent of the probate referees in each county in any one calendar year, but may revoke the appointment of at least one probate referee in each county in any one calendar year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

406.

(a) The authority of a person to act as a probate referee ceases immediately upon expiration of the person’s term of office, revocation of the person’s appointment, or other termination pursuant to law.

(b) Upon cessation of authority of a person to act as a probate referee, the Controller shall notify the superior court of the county for which the probate referee was appointed. Upon receipt of notice, or if it otherwise comes to the attention of the court that the authority of a person to act as a probate referee has ceased, the court shall reassign any estate for which
 the person had been designated as probate referee to another probate referee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

407.

(a) As used in this section, “prohibited political activity” means directly or indirectly soliciting, receiving, or contributing, or being in any manner involved in soliciting, receiving, or contributing, any of the following:

(1) An assessment, subscription, or contribution to any party, incumbent, committee, or candidate exceeding two hundred dollars ($200) in any one calendar year for any partisan public office of this state.

(2) An assessment, subscription, contribution, or political service in any
 amount for any campaign for the office of Controller.

(b) Upon a person’s appointment and thereafter in January of each year during the person’s tenure as a probate referee, the person shall file with the Controller a verified statement indicating whether the person has engaged in prohibited political activity during the preceding two calendar years.

(c) The Controller may not appoint or reappoint as a probate referee a person who within the preceding two calendar years has engaged in prohibited political activity, and any such appointment or reappointment is void and shall be revoked. The Controller shall revoke the appointment of a person who, during the person’s tenure as a probate referee, engages in prohibited political activity. However, all acts not otherwise invalid, performed by the person before revocation of the person’s appointment, are valid.

(d) A person shall not engage in prohibited political activity during the time the person is an applicant for appointment or reappointment, or during the person’s tenure as a probate referee. A violation of this subdivision is a misdemeanor.

(e) Subdivisions (a), (c), and (d) do not apply to any prohibited political activity that occurred before July 1, 1989, and the applicable law in effect before July 1, 1989, continues to apply. Subdivision (b) applies on July 1, 1989, to persons who apply for appointment on or after July 1, 1989. A person who applied for appointment or who was appointed before July 1, 1989, shall file the first statement required by subdivision (b) on or before July 1, 1989, and thereafter as prescribed in subdivision (b).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

408.

The appointment of a probate referee by the Controller before July 1, 1989, is not invalidated by the repeal of the law under which the appointment was made. Appointment of a probate referee before July 1, 1989, may be revoked under this chapter only if revocation would otherwise be proper under this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Powers of Probate Referee [450. - 453.]

450.

Upon designation by the court, the probate referee has all the powers of a referee of the superior court and all other powers provided in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

451.

(a) For the purpose of appraisal of property in the estate, the probate referee may require, and may issue a subpoena to compel, the appearance before the referee of the personal representative, guardian, conservator, or other fiduciary, an interested person, or any other person the referee has reason to believe has knowledge of the property.

(b) A subpoena issued under subdivision (a) is subject to the provisions of Chapter 6 (commencing with
 Section 2020.010) of Title 4 of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure governing deposition subpoenas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 182, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 64 of Ch. 182.)
-------------------------------------------

452.

(a) The probate referee may:

(1) Examine and take the testimony under oath of a person appearing before the referee.

(2) Require, and issue a subpoena to compel, the person to produce any document in the person’s possession or control, concerning the value of any property in the estate.

(b) A subpoena issued under
 subdivision (a) is subject to the provisions of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2020.010) of Title 4 of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure governing deposition subpoenas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 182, Sec. 53.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 64 of Ch. 182.)
-------------------------------------------

453.

(a) On petition of a person required to appear before the probate referee pursuant to this chapter, the court may make a protective order to protect the person from annoyance, embarrassment, or oppression. The petitioner shall deliver pursuant to Section 1215 notice of the hearing on the petition to the probate referee and to the personal representative, guardian, conservator, or other fiduciary at least 15 days before the date set for the hearing. Any subpoena issued by the probate referee is stayed during the pendency of the petition.

(b) On petition of the probate referee, the court may make an order to show cause why a person who is required, but
 fails, to appear before the probate referee pursuant to this chapter, should
 not be compelled to do so. The probate referee shall deliver pursuant to Section 1215 notice of the hearing on the petition to the person at least 15 days before the date set for the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 8.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 13. LITIGATION INVOLVING DECEDENT [550. - 555.]



  CHAPTER 1. Liability of Decedent Covered byInsurance [550. - 555.]

550.

(a) Subject to the provisions of this chapter, an action to establish the decedent’s liability for which the decedent was protected by insurance may be commenced or continued against the decedent’s estate without the need to join as a party the decedent’s personal representative or successor in interest.

(b) The remedy provided in this chapter is cumulative and may be pursued concurrently with other remedies.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

551.

Notwithstanding Section 366.2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if the limitations period otherwise applicable to the action has not expired at the time of the decedent’s death, an action under this chapter may be commenced within one year after the expiration of the limitations period otherwise applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 178, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

552.

(a) An action under this chapter shall name as the defendant, “Estate of (name of decedent), Deceased.” Summons shall be served on a person designated in writing by the insurer or, if none, on the insurer. Further proceedings shall be in the name of the estate, but otherwise shall be conducted in the same manner as if the action were against the personal representative.

(b) On motion of an interested person, or on its own motion, the court in which the action is pending may, for good cause, order the appointment and substitution of a personal representative as the
 defendant.

(c) An action against the estate of the decedent under this chapter may be consolidated with an action against the personal representative.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

553.

The insurer may deny or otherwise contest its liability in an action under this chapter or by an independent action. Unless the personal representative is joined as a party, a judgment in the action under this chapter or in the independent action does not adjudicate rights by or against the estate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

554.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), either the damages sought in an action under this chapter shall be within the limits and coverage of the insurance, or recovery of damages outside the limits or coverage of the insurance shall be waived. A judgment in favor of the plaintiff in the action is enforceable only from the insurance coverage and not against property in the estate.

(b) Where the amount of damages sought in the action exceeds the coverage of the insurance, subdivision (a) does not apply if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The personal representative is joined as a party to the action.

(2) The plaintiff files a claim in compliance with Section 9390.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 710, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 48 of Ch. 710.)
-------------------------------------------

555.

(a) This chapter does not apply to an action commenced before July 1, 1989.

(b) The applicable law in effect before July 1, 1989, continues to apply to an action commenced before July 1, 1989, notwithstanding its repeal by Chapter 1199 of the Statutes of 1988.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 14. POWERS OF APPOINTMENT [600. - 695.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [600. - 601.]

600.

Except to the extent that the common law rules governing powers of appointment are modified by statute, the common law as to powers of appointment is the law of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 30, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

601.

If the law existing at the time of the creation of a power of appointment and the law existing at the time of the release or exercise of the power of appointment or at the time of the assertion of a right given by this part differ, the law existing at the time of the release, exercise, or assertion of a right controls. Nothing in this section makes invalid a power of appointment created before July 1, 1970, that was valid under the law in existence at the time it was created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 30, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions; Classification of Powers of Appointment [610. - 613.]

610.

As used in this part:

(a) “Appointee” means the person in whose favor a power of appointment is exercised.

(b) “Appointive property” means the property or interest in property that is the subject of the power of appointment.

(c) “Creating instrument” means the deed, will, trust, or other writing or document that creates or reserves the power of appointment.

(d) “Donor” means the person who creates or reserves a power of appointment.

(e) “Permissible appointee” means a person in whose favor a
 power of appointment can be exercised.

(f) “Power of appointment” means a power that enables a powerholder acting in a nonfiduciary capacity to designate a recipient of an ownership interest in or another power of appointment over the appointive property. The term does not include a power of attorney.

(g) “Powerholder” means the person to whom a power of appointment is given or in whose favor a power of appointment is reserved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 1.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

611.

(a) A power of appointment is “general” only to the extent that it is exercisable in favor of the powerholder, the powerholder’s estate, the powerholder’s creditors, or creditors of the
 powerholder’s estate, whether or not it is exercisable in favor of others.

(b) A power to consume, invade, or appropriate property for the benefit of a person in discharge of the powerholder’s obligation of support that is limited by an ascertainable standard relating to the person’s health, education, support, or maintenance is not a general power of appointment.

(c) A power exercisable by the powerholder only in conjunction with a person having a
 substantial interest in the appointive property that is adverse to the exercise of the power in favor of the powerholder, the powerholder’s estate, the powerholder’s creditors, or creditors of the powerholder’s estate is not
 a general power of appointment.

(d) A power of appointment that is not “general” is “special.”

(e) A power of appointment may be general as to some appointive property, or an interest in or a specific portion of appointive property, and be special as to other appointive property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 2.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

612.

(a) A power of appointment is “testamentary” if it is exercisable only by a will.

(b) A power of appointment is “presently exercisable” at the time in question to the extent that an irrevocable appointment can be made.

(c) A power of appointment is “not presently exercisable” if it is “postponed.” A power of appointment is “postponed” in either of the following circumstances:

(1) The creating instrument provides that the power of appointment may be exercised only after a specified act or event occurs or a specified condition is met, and the act or event has not occurred or the condition has not been met.

(2) The creating instrument provides that an exercise of the power of appointment is revocable until a specified act or event occurs or a specified condition is met, and the act or event has not occurred or the condition has not been met.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 30, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

613.

A power of appointment is “imperative” where the creating instrument manifests an intent that the permissible appointees be benefited even if the powerholder fails to exercise the power. An imperative power can exist even though the powerholder has the privilege of selecting some and excluding others of the designated permissible appointees. All other powers of appointment are “discretionary.” The
 powerholder of a discretionary power is privileged to exercise, or not to exercise, the power as the powerholder chooses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 3.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Creation of Powers of Appointment [620. - 621.]

620.

A power of appointment can be created only by a donor having the capacity to transfer the interest in property to which the power relates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 30, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

621.

(a) A power of appointment is created only if all of the following are satisfied:

(1) There is a creating instrument.

(2) The creating instrument is valid under applicable law.

(3) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the creating instrument transfers the appointive property.

(4) The terms of the creating instrument manifest the donor’s intent to create in a powerholder a power of appointment over the appointive property exercisable in favor of a permissible appointee.

(b) Paragraph (3)
 of subdivision (a) does not apply to the creation of a power of appointment by the exercise of a power of appointment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 4.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Exercise of Powers of Appointment [625. - 662.]



  ARTICLE 1. Donee’s Capacity [625. - 625.]

625.

(a) A power of appointment can be exercised only by a powerholder having the capacity to transfer the interest in property to which the power relates.

(b) Unless the creating instrument otherwise provides, a powerholder who is a minor may not exercise a power of appointment during minority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 5.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Scope of Donee’s Authority [630. - 635.]

630.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this part, if the creating instrument specifies requirements as to the manner, time, and conditions of the exercise of a power of appointment, the power can be exercised only by complying with those requirements.

(b) Unless expressly prohibited by the creating instrument, a power stated to be exercisable by an inter vivos instrument is also exercisable by a written will.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 30, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

631.

(a) Where an appointment does not satisfy the formal requirements specified in the creating instrument as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 630, the court may excuse compliance with the formal requirements and determine that exercise of the appointment was effective if both of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The appointment approximates the manner of appointment prescribed by the donor.

(2) The
 failure to satisfy the formal requirements does not defeat the accomplishment of a significant purpose of the donor.

(b) This section does not permit a court to excuse compliance with a specific reference requirement under Section 632.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 30, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

632.

If the creating instrument expressly directs that a power of appointment be exercised by an instrument that makes a specific reference to the power or to the instrument that created the power, the power can be exercised only by an instrument containing the required reference.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 30, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

633.

(a) If the creating instrument requires the consent of the donor or other person to exercise a power of appointment, the power can only be exercised when the required consent is contained in the instrument of exercise or in a separate written instrument, signed in each case by the person whose consent is required.

(b) Unless expressly prohibited by the creating instrument:

(1) If a person whose consent is required dies, the power may be exercised by the powerholder
 without the consent of that person.

(2) If a person whose consent is required becomes legally incapable of consenting, the person’s guardian or conservator may consent to an exercise of the power.

(3) A consent may be given before or after the exercise of the power by the powerholder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 6.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

634.

A power of appointment created in favor of two or more powerholders can only be exercised when all of the powerholders unite in its exercise. If one or more of the powerholders dies, becomes legally incapable of exercising
 the power, or releases the power, the power may be exercised by the others, unless expressly prohibited by the creating instrument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 7.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

635.

Nothing in this chapter affects the power of a court of competent jurisdiction to remedy a defective exercise of an imperative power of appointment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 30, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Donee’s Required Intent [640. - 642.]

640.

(a) The exercise of a power of appointment requires a manifestation of the powerholder’s intent to exercise the power.

(b) A manifestation of the powerholder’s intent to exercise a power of appointment exists in any of the following circumstances:

(1) The
 powerholder declares, in substance, that the powerholder exercises specific powers or all the powers the powerholder has.

(2) The powerholder purports to transfer an interest in the appointive property that the
 powerholder would have no power to transfer except by virtue of the power.

(3) The powerholder makes a disposition that, when considered with reference to the property owned and the circumstances existing at the time of the disposition, manifests the powerholder’s understanding that the powerholder was disposing of
 the appointive property.

(c) The circumstances described in subdivision (b) are illustrative, not exclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 8.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

641.

(a) A general residuary clause in a will, or a will making general disposition of all the testator’s property, does not exercise a power of appointment held by the testator unless specific reference is made to the power or there is some other indication of intent to exercise the power.

(b) This section applies in a case where the powerholder dies on or after July 1, 1982.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 9.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

642.

If a power of appointment existing at the powerholder’s death, but created after the execution of the powerholder’s will, is exercised by the will, the appointment is effective except in either of the following cases:

(a) The creating instrument manifests an intent that the power may not be exercised by a will previously executed.

(b) The will manifests an intent not to exercise a power subsequently acquired.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 10.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Types of Appointments [650. - 652.]

650.

(a) The powerholder of a general power of appointment may make an appointment:

(1) Of all of the appointive property at one time, or several partial appointments at different times, where the power is exercisable inter vivos.

(2) Of present or future interests or both.

(3) Subject to conditions or charges.

(4) Subject to otherwise lawful
 restraints on the alienation of the appointed interest.

(5) In trust.

(6) Creating a new power of appointment.

(b) The listing in subdivision (a) is illustrative, not exclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 11.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

651.

Subject to the limitations imposed by the creating instrument, the powerholder of a special power may make any of the types of appointment permissible for the powerholder of a general power under Section 650.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 12.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

652.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the powerholder of a special power of appointment may appoint the whole or any part of the appointive property to any one or more of the permissible appointees and exclude others.

(b) If the donor specifies either a minimum or maximum share or amount to be appointed to one or more of the permissible appointees, the exercise of the power must conform to the specification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 13.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Contracts to Appoint; Releases [660. - 662.]

660.

(a) The powerholder of a power of appointment that is presently exercisable, whether general or special, can contract to make an appointment to the same extent that the powerholder could make an effective appointment.

(b) The
 powerholder
 of a power of appointment cannot contract to make an appointment while the power of appointment is not presently exercisable. If a promise to make an appointment under such a power is not performed, the promisee cannot obtain either specific performance or damages, but the promisee is not prevented from obtaining restitution of the value given by the promisee for the promise.

(c) Unless the creating instrument expressly provides that the powerholder may not contract to make an appointment while the power of appointment is not presently exercisable, subdivision (b) does not apply to the case where the donor and the
 powerholder are the same person. In this case, the powerholder can contract to make an appointment to the same extent that the powerholder could make an effective appointment if the power of appointment were presently exercisable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 14.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

661.

(a) Unless the creating instrument otherwise provides, a general or special power of appointment that is a discretionary power, whether testamentary or otherwise, may be released, either with or without consideration, by a written instrument signed by the powerholder and delivered as provided in subdivision (c).

(b) A releasable power may be released with respect to the whole or any part of the appointive property and may also be released in such manner as to reduce or limit the permissible appointees. No partial release of a
 power shall be deemed to make imperative the remaining power that was not imperative before the release unless the instrument of release expressly so provides. No release of a power that is not presently exercisable is permissible where the donor designated persons or a class to take in default of the powerholder’s exercise of the power unless the release serves to benefit all persons designated as provided by the donor.

(c) A release shall be delivered as follows:

(1) If the creating instrument specifies a person to whom a release is to be delivered, the release shall be delivered to that person, but delivery need not be made as provided in this paragraph if the person cannot with
 due diligence be found.

(2) In a case where the property to which the power relates is held by a trustee, the release shall be delivered to the trustee.

(3) In a case not covered by paragraph (1) or (2), the release may be delivered to any of the following:

(A) A person, other than the powerholder, who could be adversely affected by the exercise of the power.

(B) The county recorder of the county in which the
 powerholder resides or in which the deed, will, or other instrument creating the power is filed.

(d) A release of a power of appointment that affects real property or obligations secured by real property shall be acknowledged and proved, and may be certified and recorded, in like manner and with like effect as grants of real property, and all statutory provisions relating to the recordation or nonrecordation of conveyances of real property and to the effect thereof apply to a release with like effect, without regard to the date when the release was delivered, if at all, pursuant to subdivision (c). Failure to deliver, pursuant to subdivision (c), a release that is recorded pursuant to this subdivision does not affect the validity of any transaction with respect to the real property or obligation secured thereby, and the general laws of this state on recording and its effect govern the transaction.

(e) This section does not impair the validity of a release made before July 1, 1970.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 15.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

662.

(a) A release on behalf of a minor powerholder shall be made by the guardian of the estate of the minor pursuant to an order of court obtained under this section.

(b) The guardian or other interested person may file a petition with the court in which the guardianship of the estate proceeding is pending for an order of the court authorizing or requiring the guardian to release the ward’s powers as a
 powerholder
 or a power of appointment in whole or in part.

(c) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1 of Division 4 to all of the following (other than the petitioner or persons joining in the petition):

(1) The persons required to be given notice under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1 of Division 4.

(2) The donor of the power, if alive.

(3) The trustee, if the property to which the power relates is held by a trustee.

(4) Other persons as ordered by the court.

(d) After hearing, the court in
 its discretion may make an order authorizing or requiring the guardian to release on behalf of the ward a general or special power of appointment as permitted under Section 661, if the court determines, taking into consideration all the relevant circumstances, that the ward as a prudent person would make the release of the power of appointment if the ward had the capacity to do so.

(e) Nothing in this section imposes any duty on the guardian to file a petition under this section, and the guardian is not liable for failure to file a petition under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 16.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Effect of Failure to Make Effective Appointment [670. - 676.]

670.

An exercise of a power of appointment is not void solely because it is more extensive than authorized by the power, but is valid to the extent that the exercise was permissible under the terms of the power.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 30, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

671.

(a) Unless the creating instrument or the powerholder, in writing, manifests a contrary intent, where the powerholder dies without having exercised an imperative power of appointment either in whole or in part, the persons designated as permissible appointees take equally of the property not already appointed. Where the creating instrument establishes a minimum distribution requirement that is not
 satisfied by an equal division of the property not already appointed, the appointees who have received a partial appointment are required to return a pro rata portion of the property they would otherwise be entitled to receive in an amount sufficient to meet the minimum distribution requirement.

(b) Where an imperative power of appointment has been exercised defectively, either in whole or in part, its proper execution may be adjudged in favor of the person intended to be benefited by the defective exercise.

(c) Where an imperative power of appointment has been created so that it confers on a person a right to have the power exercised in the person’s favor, the proper exercise of the power can be compelled in favor of the person, or the person’s assigns, creditors, guardian, or conservator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 17.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

672.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), if the powerholder of a discretionary power of appointment fails to appoint the property, releases the entire power, or makes an ineffective appointment, in whole or in part, the appointive property not effectively appointed passes to the person named by the donor as taker in default or, if there is none, reverts to the donor.

(b) If the
 powerholder of a general power of appointment makes an ineffective appointment, an implied alternative appointment to the powerholder’s estate may be found if the powerholder has manifested an intent that the appointive property be disposed of as property of the powerholder rather than as in default of appointment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 18.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

673.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), if an appointment by will or by instrument effective only at the death of the powerholder is ineffective because of the death of an appointee before the appointment becomes effective and the appointee leaves issue surviving the powerholder, the surviving issue of the appointee take the appointed property in the same manner as the appointee would have taken
 had the appointee survived the
 powerholder, except that the property passes only to persons who are permissible appointees, including appointees permitted under Section 674. If the surviving issue are all of the same degree of kinship to the deceased appointee, they take equally, but if of unequal degree, then those of more remote degree take in the manner provided in Section 240.

(b) This section does not apply if either the donor or powerholder manifests an intent that some other disposition of the appointive property shall be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 19.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

674.

(a) Unless the creating instrument expressly provides otherwise, if a permissible appointee dies before the exercise of a special power of appointment, the powerholder has the power to appoint to the issue of the deceased permissible appointee, whether or not the issue was included within the description of the permissible appointees, if the deceased permissible appointee was alive at the time of the execution of the creating instrument or was born thereafter.

(b) This section applies whether the special power of appointment is
 exercisable by inter vivos instrument, by will, or otherwise.

(c) This section applies to a case where the power of appointment is exercised on or after July 1, 1982, but does not affect the validity of any exercise of a power of appointment made before July 1, 1982.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 20.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

675.

If a powerholder exercises a power of appointment in a disposition that also disposes of property the powerholder owns, the owned property and the appointive property shall be allocated in the permissible manner in accordance with the terms of the creating instrument and that best carries out the powerholder’s intent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 21.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

676.

Unless the terms of the instrument creating or exercising a power of appointment manifest a contrary intent, if the powerholder makes a valid partial appointment to a taker in default of appointment, the taker in default of appointment may share fully in unappointed property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 22.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Rights of Creditors [680. - 684.]

680.

The donor of a power of appointment cannot nullify or alter the rights given creditors of the powerholder by Sections 682, 683, and 684 by any language in the instrument creating the power.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 23.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

681.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), property covered by a special power of appointment is not subject to the claims of creditors of the powerholder or of the
 powerholder’s estate or to the expenses of the administration of the powerholder’s estate.

(b) Property subject to a special power of appointment shall be subject to the claims of creditors of the powerholder or of the powerholder’s estate or the expenses of administration of the powerholder’s estate under either of the following circumstances:

(1) To the extent that the powerholder owned the property and, reserving the special power, transferred the property in violation of the Uniform Voidable Transactions Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 3439) of Title 2 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Civil Code).

(2) If the initial gift in default of the exercise of the power is to the powerholder or the powerholder’s
 estate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 81, Sec. 24.   (AB 2846)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

682.

(a) To the extent that the property owned by the powerholder is inadequate to satisfy the claims of the powerholder’s creditors, property subject to a general power of appointment that is presently exercisable is subject to the claims to the same extent that it would be subject to the claims if the property were owned by the
 powerholder.

(b) Upon the death of the powerholder, to the extent that the powerholder’s estate is inadequate to satisfy the claims of creditors of the estate and the expenses of administration of the estate, property subject to a general testamentary power of appointment or to a general power of appointment that was presently exercisable at the time of the
 powerholder’s